Hawaii statutes.
§431:21-103 Creation of association.
(a) There is created a nonprofit unincorporated legal entity to be known as
the Hawaii Property Insurance Association. All insurers included in the
definition of member insurer in section 431:21-102 shall be and remain members
of the association as a condition of their authority to transact the business
of insurance in this State. The association shall perform its functions under
a plan of operation established and approved under section 431:21-106 and shall
exercise its powers through a board of directors established under section
431:21-104.

(b) Each member insurer shall participate in
the writings, expenses, profits, and losses of the association in the
proportion that its net direct written premiums during the preceding calendar
year bear to the net direct written premiums for all member insurers for the
preceding calendar year. [L 1991, c 284, pt of §2; am L 1992, c 143, §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next